Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 4. Procedures and Education.

Sec. 18.66.300.
Standards and procedures for health care in domestic violence cases.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall adopt standards and procedures for the delivery of services to victims of domestic violence by health care facilities and practitioners of the healing arts and personnel in those facilities. The standards and procedures shall be formulated in consultation with the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault, the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, private agencies that provide services for victims of domestic violence, and persons with expertise in providing health care and other services to victims of domestic violence.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall make available to health care facilities and practitioners of the healing arts and personnel in those facilities a written notice of the rights of victims of domestic violence and the services available to them. The notice shall be substantially similar to the notice provided in AS

18.65.520(a)

.

The Department of Health and Social Services may adopt regulations to implement and interpret this section.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 18.66.310.
Continuing education for public employees, court system employees, and for prosecuting authorities.

Employers of state or local public employees, including employees of public schools, shall, in consultation with the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault, provide continuing education in domestic violence for the public employees who are required by law to report abuse or neglect of children under AS

47.17.020

.

The administrative director of the Alaska Court System shall, in consultation with the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault, provide continuing education in domestic violence for judicial officers and court clerks who have contact with parties involved in domestic violence.

The Department of Law and other prosecuting authorities in the state shall, in consultation with the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault, provide continuing education in domestic violence for prosecuting attorneys and other employees who have contact with persons involved in domestic violence.

The continuing education required under (a) — (c) of this section must be offered at least once every two years and must include information on the following subjects:

the nature, extent, and causes of domestic violence;

procedures designed to promote the safety of the victim and other household members;

resources available to victims and perpetrators of domestic violence; and

the lethality of domestic violence.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 18 ch 2 SSSLA 2015)